South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3455.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-17-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-17-10.  (A) Every school district is and shall be a body politic and corporate, by the name and style of (a descriptive name may be designated by the county board of education or legislative act) School District No (such number may be designated by the county board of education or legislative act), of County (the name of the county in which the district is situated), the State of South Carolina. In that name it may sue and be sued and be capable of contracting and being contracted with to the extent of its school fund and holding such real and personal estate as it may have or come into possession of, by will or otherwise, or as is authorized by law to be purchased, all of which shall be used exclusively for school purposes. (B) A school district shall be responsible for the discipline of students within that school district. The school district has the authority to establish rules and regulations concerning discipline concerning the students. SECTION 2.  Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 9 Office of School Districts Administration Section 59-9-10. The office of School Districts Administration is established within the Governor's Office. Section 59-9-20. The office of School Districts Administration shall consist of an Executive Director and staff as may be necessary. The Executive Director must be appointed by the Governor. Section 59-9-30. The Office of School Districts Administration is responsible for the selection and oversight of local school district superintendents. SECTION 3.  As of the effective date of this act, a local school district must not enter into a new contract for the position of a district superintendent, nor may a local school district extend the duration of a current contract for the position of a district superintendent. SECTION 4.A.  Upon the effective date of this act, the State Board of Education is abolished and its functions, powers, duties, responsibilities, and authority, except as otherwise provided by law, are devolved upon the State Superintendent of Education. B. The Code Commissioner is directed to eliminate all references to the State Board of Education from the S.C. Code. The Code Commissioner shall deliver a report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives concerning the changes to the S.C. Code reflecting the provisions of this section. C. Chapter 5, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 5.A.  Upon the effective date of this act, the Education Oversight Committee is abolished, and its powers, duties, responsibilities, and authority, except as otherwise provided by law, are devolved upon the State Superintendent of Education. B. The Code Commissioner is directed to eliminate all references to the Education Oversight Committee from the S.C. Code. The Code Commissioner shall deliver a report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives concerning the changes to the S.C. Code reflecting the provisions of this section. SECTION 6.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----